Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-15,101.04
Class C low-level radioactive waste; storage; disposal; requirements.

Class C low-level radioactive waste, as defined by 10 C.F.R. 61.55 in effect on January 26, 1983, shall be stored or disposed of separately from other types of low-level radioactive waste in containers which can be easily monitored and retrieved and shall be handled, stored, and disposed of in a manner consistent with the zero-release objective described in section 81-1580.

Laws 1988, LB 1092, § 9.